Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,147
Nail technology school; license; requirements.

In order to be licensed as a nail technology school by the department, an applicant shall meet, and present to the department evidence of meeting, the following requirements:

(1) The proposed school shall be a fixed, permanent structure or part of one;

(2) The proposed school shall have a contracted enrollment of students;

(3) The proposed school shall contain at least five hundred square feet of floor space and facilities, staff, apparatus, and equipment appropriate to its projected enrollment in accordance with the standards established by rule and regulation; and

(4) The proposed school shall not have the same entrance as or direct access to a cosmetology salon or nail technology salon.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 67;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,218;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 409;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 52.